California statutes. Civil Code
(d) Notwithstanding Section 1950.6, if an applicant provides a reusable tenant screening report to a landlord that accepts reusable tenant screening reports, the landlord shall not charge the applicant either of the following:

(1) A fee for the landlord to access the report.

(2) An application screening fee.

(e) As used in this section:

(1) “Applicant” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1950.6.

(2) “Application screening fee” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1950.6.

(3) “Consumer
 report” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1681a of Title 15 of the United States Code.

(4) “Consumer reporting agency” means a person which, for monetary fees, dues, or on a cooperative nonprofit basis, regularly engages in whole or in part in the practice of assembling or evaluating consumer credit information or other information on consumers for the purpose of furnishing consumer reports to third parties and that uses any means or facility of interstate commerce for the purpose of preparing or furnishing consumer reports.

(5) “Landlord” means an owner of residential rental property or the owner’s agent.

(6) “Reusable tenant screening report” means a consumer report that meets all of the following criteria:

(A) Was prepared within the previous 30 days by a consumer reporting agency at the request and expense of an applicant.

(B) Is made directly available to a landlord for use in the rental application process or is provided through a third-party website that regularly engages in the business of providing a reusable tenant screening report and complies with all state and federal laws pertaining to use and disclosure of information contained in a consumer report by a consumer reporting agency.

(C) Is available to the landlord at no cost to access or use.

(f) This section does not affect any other applicable law related to the consideration of criminal history
 information in housing, including, but not limited to, Article 24 (commencing with Section 12264) of Subchapter 7 of Chapter 5 of Division 4.1 of Title 2 of the California Code of Regulations and local ordinances governing the information that landlords may review and consider when determining to whom they will rent.

(g) If an ordinance, resolution, regulation, administrative action, initiative, or other policy adopted by a city, county, or city and county conflicts with this section, the policy that provides greater protections to applicants shall apply.

(h) This section does not require a landlord to accept
 reusable tenant screening reports.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 288, Sec. 1.   (AB 2559)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1950.5.

(a) This section applies to security for a rental agreement for residential property that is used as the dwelling of the tenant.

(b) As used in this section, “security” means any payment, fee, deposit, or charge, including, but not limited to, any payment, fee, deposit, or charge, except as provided in Section 1950.6, that is imposed at the beginning of the tenancy to be used to reimburse the landlord for costs associated with processing a new tenant or that is imposed as an advance payment of rent, used or to be used for any purpose, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(1) The compensation of a landlord for a
 tenant’s default in the payment of rent.

(2) The repair of damages to the premises, exclusive of ordinary wear and tear, caused by the tenant or by a guest or licensee of the tenant.

(3) The cleaning of the premises upon termination of the tenancy necessary to return the unit to the same level of cleanliness it was in at the inception of the tenancy. The amendments to this paragraph enacted by the act adding this sentence shall apply only to tenancies for which the tenant’s right to occupy begins after January 1, 2003.

(4) To remedy future defaults by the tenant in any obligation under the rental agreement to restore, replace, or return personal property or appurtenances, exclusive of ordinary wear and tear, if the
 security deposit is authorized to be applied thereto by the rental agreement.

(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), (3), or (5), a landlord shall not demand or receive security, however denominated, in an amount or value in excess of an amount equal to one month’s rent, in addition to any rent for the first month paid on or before initial occupancy.

(2) This subdivision does not prohibit an advance payment of not less than six months’ rent if the term of the lease is six months or longer.

(3) This subdivision does not preclude a landlord and a tenant from entering into a mutual agreement for the landlord, at the request of the tenant and for a specified fee or charge, to make structural,
 decorative, furnishing, or other similar alterations, if the alterations are other than cleaning or repairing for which the landlord may charge the previous tenant as provided by subdivision (e).

(4) On or after April 1, 2025, if a landlord or its agent charges a service member who rents residential property in which the service member will reside a higher than standard or advertised security pursuant to paragraph (1) due to the credit history, credit score, housing history, or other factor related to the tenant, the landlord shall provide the tenant with a written statement, on or before the date the lease is signed, of the amount of the higher security and an explanation why the higher security amount is being charged. The additional amount of security shall be returned to the tenant after no more than six months of residency if the tenant
 is not in arrears for any rent due during that period. The date for return of the additional amount of security shall be included in the lease agreement. For purposes of this paragraph, “service member” has the same meaning as in Section 400 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(5) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a landlord shall not demand or receive security, however denominated, in an amount or value in excess of an amount equal to two months’ rent, in addition to any rent for the first month paid on or before initial occupancy if the landlord meets both of the following requirements:

(i) The landlord is a natural person or a limited liability company in which all members are natural persons.

(ii) The
 landlord owns no more than two residential rental properties that collectively include no more than four dwelling units offered for rent.

(B) Subparagraph (A) shall not apply if the prospective tenant is a service member. A landlord shall not refuse to enter into a rental agreement for residential property with a prospective tenant who is a service member because this subparagraph prohibits the landlord from demanding or receiving a greater amount of security than that which is established in paragraph (1). For purposes of this subparagraph, “service member” has the same meaning as in Section 400 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(C) For purposes of this paragraph:

(i) “Natural person” includes any natural person who is a
 settlor or beneficiary of a family trust.

(ii) “Family trust” means a revocable living trust or irrevocable trust in which the settlors and beneficiaries of the trust are persons who are related to each other as sibling, spouse, domestic partner, child, parent, grandparent, or grandchild.

(6) This subdivision shall not apply to a security collected or demanded by the landlord before July 1, 2024.

(d) Any security shall be held by the landlord for the tenant who is party to the lease or agreement. The claim of a tenant to the security shall be prior to the claim of any creditor of the landlord.

(e) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), the landlord
 may claim of the security only those amounts as are reasonably necessary for the purposes specified in subdivision (b).

(2) (A) The landlord shall not assert a claim against the tenant or the security for damages to the premises or any defective conditions that preexisted the tenancy, for ordinary wear and tear or the effects thereof, whether the wear and tear preexisted the tenancy or occurred during the tenancy, or for the cumulative effects of ordinary wear and tear occurring during any one or more tenancies.

(B) Claims against the tenant or the security for materials or supplies and for work performed by a contractor, the landlord, or the landlord’s employee shall be limited to a reasonable amount necessary to restore the premises back to the condition it was
 in at the inception of the tenancy, exclusive of ordinary wear and tear.

(C) The landlord shall not require a tenant to pay for, or assert a claim against the tenant or the security for, professional carpet cleaning or other professional cleaning services, unless reasonably necessary to return the premises to the condition it was in at the inception of tenancy, exclusive of ordinary wear and tear.

(f) (1) Within a reasonable time after notification of either party’s intention to terminate the tenancy, or before the end of the lease term, the landlord shall notify the tenant in writing of the tenant’s option to request an initial inspection and of the tenant’s right to be present at the inspection. At a reasonable time, but no earlier than two weeks before
 the termination or the end of lease date, the landlord, or an agent of the landlord, shall, upon the request of the tenant, make an initial inspection of the premises prior to any final inspection the landlord makes after the tenant has vacated the premises. The purpose of the initial inspection shall be to allow the tenant an opportunity to remedy identified deficiencies, in a manner consistent with the rights and obligations of the parties under the rental agreement, in order to avoid deductions from the security. If a tenant chooses not to request an initial inspection, the duties of the landlord under this subdivision are discharged. If an inspection is requested, the parties shall attempt to schedule the inspection at a mutually acceptable date and time. The landlord shall give at least 48 hours’ prior written notice of the date and time of the inspection if either a mutual time is
 agreed upon, or if a mutually agreed time cannot be scheduled but the tenant still wishes an inspection. The tenant and landlord may agree to forgo the 48-hour prior written notice by both signing a written waiver. The landlord shall proceed with the inspection whether the tenant is present or not, unless the tenant previously withdrew their request for the inspection. Written notice by the landlord shall contain, in substantially the same form, the following:

“State law permits former tenants to reclaim abandoned personal property left at the former address of the tenant, subject to certain conditions. You may or may not be able to reclaim property without incurring additional costs, depending on the cost of storing the property and the length of time before it is reclaimed. In general, these costs will be lower the sooner you contact your former landlord after
 being notified that property belonging to you was left behind after you moved out.”

(2) Based on the inspection, the landlord shall give the tenant an itemized statement specifying repairs or cleanings that are proposed to be the basis of any deductions from the security the landlord intends to make pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (b). This statement shall also include the texts of paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (b). The statement shall be given to the tenant, if the tenant is present for the inspection, or shall be left inside the premises.

(3) The tenant shall have the opportunity during the period following the initial inspection until termination of the tenancy to remedy identified deficiencies, in a manner consistent with the rights
 and obligations of the parties under the rental agreement, in order to avoid deductions from the security.

(4) Subject to paragraphs (5) and (6), if an initial inspection is conducted pursuant to this subdivision and, at the time of inspection, the premises do not contain tenant possessions that prevent the landlord from identifying repairs or cleanings due to the presence of those possessions, the landlord shall not use the security for deductions for repairs or cleanings that are not identified in the itemized statement described in paragraph (2).

(5) Nothing in this subdivision shall prevent a landlord from using the security for deductions itemized in the statement provided for in paragraph (2) that were not cured by the tenant so long as the deductions are for damages authorized by
 this section.

(6) Nothing in this subdivision shall prevent a landlord from using the security for any purpose specified in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (b) that occurs between completion of the initial inspection when possession of the unit is returned to the landlord or that was not identified during the initial inspection due to the presence of a tenant’s possessions.

(7) The requirements of this subdivision do not apply when the tenancy is terminated pursuant to subdivision (2), (3), or (4) of Section 1161 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(g) (1) For tenancies that begin on or after July 1, 2025, the landlord shall take photographs of the unit immediately before, or at the
 inception of, the tenancy.

(2) Beginning April 1, 2025, the landlord shall take photographs of the unit within a reasonable time after the possession of the unit is returned to the landlord, but prior to any repairs or cleanings for which the landlord will make a deduction from or claim against the security deposit pursuant to this section, and shall also take photographs of the unit within a reasonable time after such repairs or cleanings are completed.

(h) (1) No later than 21 calendar days after the tenant has vacated the premises, but not earlier than the time that either the landlord or the tenant provides a notice to terminate the tenancy under Section 1946 or 1946.1, Section 1161 of the Code of Civil Procedure, or not earlier than 60 calendar days prior to
 the expiration of a fixed-term lease, the landlord shall furnish the tenant, a copy of an itemized statement indicating the basis for, and the amount of, any security received and the disposition of the security, and shall return any remaining portion of the security to the tenant as follows:

(A) (i) Subject to subparagraph (C), and except as provided by clause (ii), the landlord shall return the remainder of the security by personal delivery or by a check made payable to the tenant and mailed by first-class mail, postage prepaid.

(ii) (I) If the landlord received the security or rental payments from the tenant electronically, the landlord shall return the remainder of the security electronically to a bank account or other financial
 institution designated by the tenant in writing, or by any electronic or virtual method available to the landlord if agreed to in writing by the tenant. Alternatively, the landlord and tenant may, by written agreement, designate another method of return, including, but not limited to, by personal delivery or by a check made payable to the tenant and mailed by first-class mail, postage prepaid, to an address provided by the tenant. Upon the termination of a landlord’s interest in the premises and the transfer of the security to the landlord’s successor in interest as provided in subdivision (i), the landlord’s successor in interest shall return the remainder of the security electronically to a bank account or other financial institution designated by the tenant in writing or by any electronic or virtual method available to the landlord’s successor
 in interest if agreed to in writing by the tenant only if the landlord’s successor in interest received rental payments electronically from the tenant.

(II) Pursuant to subclause (I), if the landlord received the security or rental payments from the tenant electronically or the landlord’s successor in interest received rental payments from the tenant electronically, the landlord or the landlord’s successor in interest shall, within a reasonable time after notification of either party’s intention to terminate the tenancy, or before the end of the lease term, notify the tenant in writing of the tenant’s right to receive the security electronically to a bank account or other financial institution designated by the
 tenant, or by any electronic or virtual method available to the landlord or the landlord’s successor in interest, if agreed to in writing by the tenant, pursuant to subclause (I). The requirements of this subclause do not apply when the landlord or the landlord’s successor in interest and tenant have previously entered into a written agreement designating another method of return of the security pursuant to subclause (I) or when the tenancy is terminated pursuant to subdivision (2), (3), or (4) of Section 1161 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(B) (i) Subject to subparagraph (C), and except as provided by clause (ii), the landlord shall
 furnish the itemized statement by personal delivery or first-class mail, postage prepaid.

(ii) Upon mutual agreement between the landlord and tenant entered into at the commencement of the tenancy or at any time during or after the tenancy, the itemized statement may be furnished by either of the following:

(I) Emailed to an account provided by the tenant.

(II) Mailed to an address provided by the tenant by first-class mail, postage prepaid.

(C) (i) Except as provided in clause (iii) and unless the landlord and all adult tenants residing in the unit enter into a written mutual agreement pursuant to clause (ii), if multiple adult tenants reside
 in the unit, the landlord shall return the remainder of the security by a check made payable to all adult tenants on the rental or lease agreement at the time the tenancy terminates and furnish the itemized statement by personal delivery or first-class mail, postage prepaid, to any one of the adult tenants chosen by the landlord.

(ii) If multiple adult tenants reside in the unit, the landlord may
 enter into a mutual written agreement between the landlord and all adult tenants, at the commencement of the tenancy or at any time during or after the tenancy, that specifies both of the following:

(I) How any remaining portion of the security will be returned, including whether it will be returned to a specific adult tenant or divided among multiple tenants, with the allocation percentages. If any remaining portion of the security is to be returned to multiple adult tenants, the landlord may return the security by either a check by first-class mail, postage prepaid, or an electronic deposit to a bank account or other financial institution designated by each adult tenant, as specified in the written agreement.

(II) For each adult tenant, whether the landlord will
 furnish the itemized statement by email or first-class mail, postage prepaid, along with a forwarding address or email account.

(iii) If multiple adult tenants reside in a unit and a tenant terminates the lease pursuant to Section 1946.7 and no written mutual agreement was entered into by the landlord and all adult tenants pursuant to clause (ii), and the tenant who terminated the lease pursuant to Section 1946.7 requests that the security be disbursed in a manner other than by check made payable to all adult tenants, the landlord may return the security in a manner other than by check made payable to all adult tenants.

(2) The landlord shall also include, along with and at the same time the itemized statement is sent, copies of documents showing charges incurred and deducted by
 the landlord to repair or clean the premises, as follows:

(A) If the landlord or landlord’s employee did the work, the itemized statement shall reasonably describe the work performed. The itemized statement shall include the time spent and the reasonable hourly rate charged.

(B) If the landlord or landlord’s employee did not do the work, the landlord shall provide the tenant a copy of the bill, invoice, or receipt supplied by the person or entity performing the work. The itemized statement shall provide the tenant with the name, address, and telephone number of the person or entity, if the bill, invoice, or receipt does not include that information.

(C) If a deduction is made for materials or supplies, the landlord shall
 provide a copy of the bill, invoice, or receipt. If a particular material or supply item is purchased by the landlord on an ongoing basis, the landlord may document the cost of the item by providing a copy of a bill, invoice, receipt, vendor price list, or other vendor document that reasonably documents the cost of the item used in the repair or cleaning of the unit.

(D) If a deduction is made for repairs or cleanings allowed by this section, the landlord shall provide photographs taken pursuant to subdivision (g), along with a written explanation of the cost of the allowable repairs or cleanings, as described in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive. The landlord may provide such photographs to the tenant by mail, email, computer flash drive, or by providing a link where the tenant may view the photographs online.

(3) If a repair to be done by the landlord or the landlord’s employee cannot reasonably be completed within 21 calendar days after the tenant has vacated the premises, or if the documents from a person or entity providing services, materials, or supplies are not in the landlord’s possession within 21 calendar days after the tenant has vacated the premises, the landlord may deduct the amount of a good faith estimate of the charges that will be incurred and provide that estimate with the itemized statement. If the reason for the estimate is because the documents from a person or entity providing services, materials, or supplies are not in the landlord’s possession, the itemized statement shall include the name, address, and telephone number of the person or entity. Within 14 calendar days of completing the repair or receiving the documentation,
 the landlord shall complete the requirements in paragraphs (1) and (2) in the manner specified.

(4) The landlord need not comply with paragraph (2) or (3) if either of the following applies:

(A) The deductions for repairs and cleaning together do not exceed one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125).

(B) The tenant waived the rights specified in paragraphs (2) and (3). The waiver shall only be effective if it is signed by the tenant at the same time or after a notice to terminate a tenancy under Section 1946 or 1946.1 has been given, a notice under Section 1161 of the Code of Civil Procedure has been given, or no earlier than 60 calendar days prior to the expiration of a fixed-term lease. The waiver shall
 substantially include the text of paragraph (2).

(5) Notwithstanding paragraph (4), the landlord shall comply with paragraphs (2) and (3) when a tenant makes a request for documentation within 14 calendar days after receiving the itemized statement specified in paragraph (1). The landlord shall comply within 14 calendar days after receiving the request from the tenant.

(6) Any mailings to the tenant pursuant to this subdivision shall be sent to the address provided by the tenant. If the tenant does not provide an address, mailings pursuant to this subdivision shall be sent to the unit that has been vacated.

(7) The landlord shall not be entitled to claim any amount of the security if the landlord, in bad faith, fails to comply with this
 subdivision.

(i) Upon termination of the landlord’s interest in the premises, whether by sale, assignment, death, appointment of receiver, or otherwise, the landlord or the landlord’s agent shall, within a reasonable time, do one of the following acts, either of which shall relieve the landlord of further liability with respect to the security held:

(1) Transfer the portion of the security remaining after any lawful deductions are made under subdivision (e) to the landlord’s successor in interest. The landlord shall thereafter notify the tenant by personal delivery or by first-class mail, postage prepaid, of the transfer, of any claims made against the security, of the amount of the security deposited, and of the names of the successors in interest, their addresses, and
 their telephone numbers. If the notice to the tenant is made by personal delivery, the tenant shall acknowledge receipt of the notice and sign their name on the landlord’s copy of the notice.

(2) Return the portion of the security remaining after any lawful deductions are made under subdivision (e) to the tenant, together with an accounting as provided in subdivision (h).

(j) Prior to the voluntary transfer of a landlord’s interest in the premises, the landlord shall deliver to the landlord’s successor in interest a written statement indicating the following:

(1) The security remaining after any lawful deductions are made.

(2) An itemization of any lawful deductions
 from any security received.

(3) Their election under paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (i).

This subdivision does not affect the validity of title to the real property transferred in violation of this subdivision.

(k) (1) In the event of noncompliance with subdivision (i), the landlord’s successors in interest shall be jointly and severally liable with the landlord for repayment of the security, or that portion thereof to which the tenant is entitled, when and as provided in subdivisions (e) and (h). A successor in interest of a landlord may not require the tenant to post any security to replace that amount not transferred to the tenant or successors in interest as provided in subdivision (i), unless and until the
 successor in interest first makes restitution of the initial security as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (i) or provides the tenant with an accounting as provided in subdivision (h).

(2) This subdivision does not preclude a successor in interest from recovering from the tenant compensatory damages that are in excess of the security received from the landlord previously paid by the tenant to the landlord.

(3) Notwithstanding this subdivision, if, upon inquiry and reasonable investigation, a landlord’s successor in interest has a good faith belief that the lawfully remaining security deposit is transferred to the successor in interest or returned to the tenant pursuant to subdivision (i), the successor in interest is not liable for damages as provided in subdivision (m),
 or any security not transferred pursuant to subdivision (i).

(l) Upon receipt of any portion of the security under paragraph (1) of subdivision (i), the landlord’s successors in interest shall have all of the rights and obligations of a landlord holding the security with respect to the security.

(m) The bad faith claim or retention by a landlord or the landlord’s successors in interest of the security or any portion thereof in violation of this section, or the bad faith demand of replacement of security in violation of subdivision (k), may subject the landlord or the landlord’s successors in interest to statutory damages of up to twice the amount of the security, in addition to actual damages. The court may award damages for bad faith whenever the facts warrant that award,
 regardless of whether the injured party has specifically requested relief. In an action under this section, the landlord or the landlord’s successors in interest shall have the burden of proof as to the reasonableness of the amounts claimed or the authority pursuant to this section to demand additional security deposits.

(n) A lease or rental agreement shall not contain a provision characterizing any security as “nonrefundable.”

(o) An action under this section may be maintained in small claims court if the damages claimed, whether actual, statutory, or both, are within the jurisdictional amount allowed by Section 116.220 or 116.221 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(p) Proof of the existence of and the amount of a security
 deposit may be established by any credible evidence, including, but not limited to, a canceled check, a receipt, a lease indicating the requirement of a deposit as well as the amount, prior consistent statements or actions of the landlord or tenant, or a statement under penalty of perjury that satisfies the credibility requirements set forth in Section 780 of the Evidence Code.

(q) The amendments to this section made during the 1985 portion of the 1985–86 Regular Session of the Legislature that are set forth in subdivision (e) are declaratory of existing law.

(r) The amendments to this section made during the 2003 portion of the 2003–04 Regular Session of the Legislature that are set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) are declaratory of existing
 law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 340, Sec. 1.   (AB 414)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1950.6.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 1950.5, when a landlord or their agent receives a request to rent a residential property from an applicant, the landlord or their agent may charge, pursuant to subdivision (c), that applicant an application screening fee to cover the costs of obtaining information about the applicant. The information requested and obtained by the landlord or their agent may include, but is not limited to, personal reference checks and consumer credit reports produced by consumer credit reporting agencies as defined in Section 1785.3. A landlord or their agent may, but is not required to, accept and rely upon a consumer credit report presented by an applicant.

(b) The amount of the application screening fee shall not be greater than the actual
 out-of-pocket costs of gathering information concerning the applicant, including, but not limited to, the cost of using a tenant screening service or a consumer credit reporting service, and the reasonable value of time spent by the landlord or their agent in obtaining information on the applicant. In no case shall the amount of the application screening fee charged by the landlord or their agent be greater than thirty dollars ($30) per applicant. The thirty dollar ($30) application screening fee may be adjusted annually by the landlord or their agent commensurate with an increase in the Consumer Price Index, beginning on January 1, 1998.

(c) (1) A landlord or their agent shall not charge an applicant an application screening fee when they know or should have known that no rental unit is available at that time or will be available within a reasonable period of time.

(2) A landlord or their agent may charge an applicant an application screening fee only if the landlord or their agent, at the time the application screening fee is collected, offers any of the following:

(A) An application screening process that complies with all of the following:

(i) Completed applications are considered, as provided for in the landlord’s established screening criteria, in the order in which the completed applications were received. The landlord’s screening criteria shall be provided to the applicant in writing together with the application form.

(ii) The first applicant who meets the landlord’s established screening criteria is approved for tenancy.

(iii) Applicants are not
 charged an application screening fee unless or until their application is actually considered.

(iv) Clause (iii) shall not be considered violated if a landlord or their agent inadvertently collects an application screening fee from an applicant as the result of multiple concurrent application submissions, provided that the landlord or their agent issues a refund of the application screening fee within seven days to any applicant whose application is not considered. The landlord may offer, as an alternative to refunding the screening fee, the option, at the applicant’s discretion, for the screening fee paid by the applicant to be applied to an application for another rental unit offered by the landlord. A landlord or their agent shall not be required to refund an application screening fee to an applicant whose application is denied, after consideration, because the applicant does not meet the landlord’s established screening criteria.

(B) An application screening process in which the landlord or their agent returns the entire screening fee to any applicant who is not selected for tenancy, regardless of the reason, within 7 days of selecting an applicant for tenancy or 30 days of when the application was submitted, whichever occurs first.

(d) The landlord or their agent shall provide, personally, or by mail, the applicant with a receipt for the fee paid by the applicant, which receipt shall itemize the out-of-pocket expenses and time spent by the landlord or their agent to obtain and process the information about the applicant. The landlord or their agent and the applicant may agree to have the landlord provide a copy of the receipt for the fee paid by the applicant to an email account provided by the applicant.

(e) If the landlord or their agent does
 not perform a personal reference check or does not obtain a consumer credit report, the landlord or their agent shall return any amount of the screening fee that is not used for the purposes authorized by this section to the applicant.

(f) If an application screening fee has been paid by the applicant, the landlord or their agent shall provide a copy of the consumer credit report to the applicant who is the subject of that report by personal delivery, mail, or email within seven days of the landlord or their agent receiving the report.

(g) Nothing in this section prevents a landlord from accepting a reusable screening report pursuant to Section 1950.1.

(h) As used in this section, “landlord” means an owner of residential rental property.

(i) As used in
 this section, “application screening fee” means any nonrefundable payment of money charged by a landlord or their agent to an applicant, the purpose of which is to purchase a consumer credit report and to validate, review, or otherwise process an application for the rent or lease of residential rental property.

(j) As used in this section, “applicant” means any entity or individual who makes a request to a landlord or their agent to rent a residential housing unit, or an entity or individual who agrees to act as a guarantor or cosignor on a rental agreement.

(k) The application screening fee shall not be considered an “advance fee” as that term is used in Section 10026 of the Business and Professions Code, and shall not be considered “security” as that term is used in Section 1950.5.

(l) This section is not intended
 to preempt any provisions or regulations that govern the collection of deposits and fees under federal or state housing assistance programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 29.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1950.7.

(a) Any payment or deposit of money the primary function of which is to secure the performance of a rental agreement for other than residential property or any part of the agreement, other than a payment or deposit, including an advance payment of rent, made to secure the execution of a rental agreement, shall be governed by the provisions of this section. With respect to residential property, the provisions of Section 1950.5 shall prevail.

(b) The payment or deposit of
money shall be held by the landlord for the tenant who is party to the agreement. The claim of a tenant to the payment or deposit shall be prior to the claim of any creditor of the landlord, except a trustee in bankruptcy.

(c) The landlord may claim of the payment or deposit only those amounts as are reasonably necessary to remedy tenant defaults in the payment of rent, to repair damages to the premises caused by the tenant, or to clean the premises upon termination of the tenancy, if the payment or deposit is made for any or all of those specific purposes. 

(1) If the claim of the landlord upon the payment or deposit is only for defaults in the payment of rent and the security deposit equals no more than one month’s rent plus a deposit amount clearly described as the payment of the last month’s rent, then any remaining portion of the payment or deposit shall be returned to the
tenant at a time as may be mutually agreed upon by landlord and tenant, but in no event later than 30 days from the date the landlord receives possession of the premises.

(2) If the claim of the landlord upon the payment or deposit is only for defaults in the payment of rent and the security deposit exceeds the amount of one month’s rent plus a deposit amount clearly described as the payment of the last month’s rent, then any remaining portion of the payment or deposit in excess of an amount equal to one month’s rent shall be returned to the tenant no later than two weeks after the date the landlord receives possession of the premises, with the remainder to be returned or accounted for within 30 days from the date the landlord receives possession of the premises.

(3) If the claim of the landlord upon the payment or deposit includes amounts reasonably necessary to repair damages to
the premises caused by the tenant or to clean the premises, then any remaining portion of the payment or deposit shall be returned to the tenant at a time as may be mutually agreed upon by landlord and tenant, but in no event later than 30 days from the date the landlord receives possession of the premises.

(d) Upon termination of the landlord’s interest in the unit in question, whether by sale, assignment, death, appointment of receiver or otherwise, the landlord or the landlord’s agent shall, within a reasonable time, do one of the following acts, either of which shall relieve the landlord of further liability with respect to the payment or deposit:

(1) Transfer the portion of the payment or deposit remaining after any lawful deductions made under subdivision (c) to the landlord’s successor in interest, and thereafter notify the tenant by personal delivery or certified mail of
the transfer, of any claims made against the payment or deposit, and of the transferee’s name and address. If the notice to the tenant is made by personal delivery, the tenant shall acknowledge receipt of the notice and sign his or her name on the landlord’s copy of the notice.

(2) Return the portion of the payment or deposit remaining after any lawful deductions made under subdivision (c) to the tenant.

(e) Upon receipt of any portion of the payment or deposit under paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), the transferee shall have all of the rights and obligations of a landlord holding the payment or deposit with respect to the payment or deposit.

(f) The bad faith retention by a landlord or transferee of a payment or deposit or any portion thereof, in violation of this section, may subject the landlord or the transferee
to damages not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200), in addition to any actual damages.

(g) This section is declarative of existing law and therefore operative as to all tenancies, leases, or rental agreements for other than residential property created or renewed on or after January 1, 1971.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 89, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1950.8.

(a) This section applies only to commercial leases and nonresidential tenancies of real property.
